Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-974
Water service district; assessments; delinquent; interest; rate; payment.

Assessments under section 17-973 shall become delinquent in equal annual installments over such period of years, not to exceed ten, as the governing body may determine at the time of making the levy, the first such equal installment to become delinquent in fifty days after the date of such levy. Each of such installments, except the first, shall draw interest at a rate not exceeding the rate of interest specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, payable annually, from the time of the levy until the same shall become delinquent, and after the same becomes delinquent, interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, shall be paid thereon. All of such installments may be paid at one time on any lot or land within fifty days from the date of the levy without interest and, if so paid, such lot or land shall be exempt from any lien or charge for such installments.

Laws 1967, c. 73, § 5, p. 239;

Laws 1980, LB 933, § 21;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 22;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 304.